Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28A.210.300 and 1975 c 43 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The board of directors of any school district of the second class, as provided in RCW 28A.300.065, may employ a regularly licensed physician ((or a licensed public health nurse)), a registered nurse, or an advanced registered nurse practitioner for the purpose of protecting the health of the ((children))students in said district.(2)(a) The board of directors of any school district of the first class, as provided in RCW 28A.300.065, must employ a school nurse for the purpose of protecting the health of the students in said district.(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "school nurse" means a registered nurse or an advanced registered nurse practitioner who holds a valid educational staff associate certificate for school nurses.--- END ---